Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 25
MINIMUM SECURITY FACILITIES

17-25-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of corrections.

"Minimum security facility" means a facility which is designed and operated to protect the public from least security risk inmates and is operated by the department for adult felony inmates committed to the custody of the executive director of the department and includes but is not limited to the Colorado correctional center at Golden, the Rifle correctional center at Rifle, and the Delta correctional center at Delta, but does not include any community corrections program as defined in section 17-27-102 (3).

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 934, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 699, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 54, § 17, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 718, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) in House Bill 93-1190 and House Bill 93-1233 were harmonized.

17-25-102. Minimum security facility - limitations.

Except for correctional facilities located in Fremont county and Delta county, a permanent minimum security facility existing on July 14, 1989, including the Rifle correctional center, shall not exceed a capacity of one hundred ninety-two inmates.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the Colorado correctional center shall not exceed a capacity of one hundred fifty inmates.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 935, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section R&RE, p. 20, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1282, § 20, effective June 5.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1150, § 13, effective June 1.

17-25-103. Placement limitations.

No adult felony violent or sex offender shall be placed by the department in a minimum security facility located in any county without first having been placed in at least one more restrictive setting for not less than six months. Said six-month time period shall include any time spent by the inmate in any diagnostic unit operated by the department. The six-month requirement may be waived only with the approval of the executive director.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 935, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 45, effective May 24.